New Jersey, session 222, S4538.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The following line items and language provisions are added to section 1 of P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for fiscal year 2026, as follows: 01 LEGISLATURE 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 77 Legislative Commissions and Committees DIRECT STATE SERVICES 09-0018  State Commission of Investigation......................... $650,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Legislative Commissions and Committees......... $650,000 Direct State Services: State Commission of Investigation: 09   Expenses of Commission........................ ($650,000) 10 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 49 Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation GRANTS-IN-AID 03-3330  Agricultural and Natural Resources....................... $299,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation........... .......................................................................... $299,000 Grants-in-Aid: 03   Avellana Agroforestry Cooperative  Supply Chain Infrastructure......................................... ($299,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Avellana Agroforestry Cooperative - Supply Chain Infrastructure shall support hazelnut processing automation, cold storage, food safety compliance, and commercial-scale infrastructure, to develop New Jersey agroforestry and the regional food supply chain. 16 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs GRANTS-IN-AID 03-1630  Family and Community Partnerships.................. $1,840,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Social Services Programs................................. $1,840,000 Grants-in-Aid: 03   Domestic Violence Housing Support.. ($1,000,000) 03   Essex County Family Justice Center...... ($340,000) 03   SAFE in Hunterdon  Property Acquisition and Capital Improvements........................................ ($500,000) 22 COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 41 Community Development Management GRANTS-IN-AID 02-8020  Housing Services.................................................. $1,125,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Community Development Management.......... $1,125,000 Grants-in-Aid: 02   NJ Community Capital Foreclosure Mitigation Program............................................................. ($1,125,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for NJ Community Capital Foreclosure Mitigation Program, an amount not to exceed $1,125,000 shall be allocated to support and expand access to affordable housing opportunities in the City of Newark, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs GRANTS-IN-AID 05-8050  Community Resources.......................................... $5,985,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Social Services Programs................................. $5,985,000 Grants-in-Aid: 05   Boys and Girls Club of Monmouth County ..................................................................... ($75,000) 05   Camden Lutheran Housing, Inc. - Casa del Rios Project................................................................ ($650,000) 05   Community Affairs and Resource Center ($50,000) 05   Girl Scouts of New Jersey - Operational Support................................................................ ($250,000) 05   Greater Mount Zion Community Development Corporation......................................... ($1,500,000) 05   Horizons at the Jersey Shore..................... ($75,000) 05   Interfaith Neighbors - Heritage Walk....... ($50,000) 05   Jersey Shore Dream Center, Neptune - Infrastructure Improvements.......................................... ($75,000) 05   Jewish Community Center of Middlesex County................................................................ ($500,000) 05   Magnolia Fire Company - Facility Improvements................................................................ ($560,000) 05   Maria Magda Hispanic Multi-Purpose Service Center - Capital Improvements............................................. ................................................................ ($1,000,000) 05   St. Joseph's Senior Home, Woodbridge - Generator Replacement.......................................... ($500,000) 05   The Paul Robeson House of Princeton - Restoration Project.................................................... ($400,000) 05   United Community Corporation, Newark................ ................................................................... ($300,000) 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 75 State Subsidies and Financial Aid STATE AID 04-8030  Local Government Services............................. $174,078,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid............... $174,078,000 State Aid: 04   Borough of Bradley Beach - Police Department Radio Communication System Upgrades....... ($200,000) 04   Borough of Buena - Bruno Melini Park Lighting Upgrades................................................................ ($450,000) 04   Borough of Cliffside Park - Municipal Library and Recreation Center Capital Improvements ($1,750,000) 04   Borough of East Newark - Recreation Improvements................................................................ ($250,000) 04   Borough of East Rutherford - Lois Lane Athletic Complex Capital Improvements............................................. ................................................................ ($1,250,000) 04   Borough of Frenchtown - Municipal Building Renovations................................................................ ($200,000) 04   Borough of Glen Ridge - Transportation and Public Safety Modernization.......................................... ($50,000) 04   Borough of Haledon - Recreational Improvements................................................................ ($800,000) 04   Borough of Keansburg - Park Improvements ($100,000) 04   Borough of Metuchen - Memorial Park Improvements................................................................ ($500,000) 04   Borough of Rutherford - Memorial Park Field Renovations........................................ ($1,250,000) 04   Borough of Shrewsbury - Police Equipment........... ..................................................................... ($50,000) 04   Borough of South Plainfield - Monument Park Improvements.......................................... ($55,000) 04   Borough of Wood-Ridge - Highland Avenue Recreation Center.................................................. ($5,000,000) 04   City of Clifton - Nash Park Improvements.............. ................................................................... ($500,000) 04   City of Elizabeth - Lead Service Line Improvements................................................................ ($500,000) 04   City of Linden - Operating Aid............ ($2,175,000) 04   City of Perth Amboy - Operating Aid. ($2,500,000) 04   City of Plainfield - Operating Aid....... ($4,000,000) 04   City of Rahway - Operating Aid.......... ($2,175,000) 04   County of Mercer - Wharf Park Construction ($1,250,000) 04   Essex County - Urban Park Improvements.............. ................................................................ ($2,250,000) 04   Town of Harrison - Recreation Projects ($250,000) 04   Town of West New York - Operating Aid and Public Library Construction.......................... ($1,500,000) 04   Township of Belleville - Emergency Response Reimbursement...................................... ($423,000) 04   Township of Bloomfield - Public Services and Personnel Aid....................................................... ($1,200,000) 04   Township of Burlington - La Gorce Square Roadway Improvements........................................ ($700,000) 04   Township of Franklin (Gloucester) - Community Center Construction........................................... ($650,000) 04   Township of Hamilton (Mercer) - Fire Engine Acquisition............................................................. ($1,100,000) 04   Township of Lawrence (Mercer) - Community Center Restoration.......................................... ($2,000,000) 04   Township of Weehawken - Operating Aid.............. ................................................................ ($1,000,000) 04   Township of Woodbridge - Municipal Court Relocation and Renovation................................... ($3,000,000) 04   Transitional Aid to Localities.......... ($135,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated from the General Fund for Transitional Aid to Localities, $110,400,000 shall be provided as loans, as determined by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided, however, that the terms, conditions, and repayment schedule of the loans shall be established by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services, in consultation with the State Treasurer, and shall be memorialized in a memorandum of understanding to be entered into between the Department of Community Affairs and the respective municipality.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the remaining amount hereinabove appropriated, such amounts, as determined by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services, shall be provided to one or more municipalities to fund approved applications for aid following needs assessments conducted by the Division of Local Government Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided, however, that the Director of the Division of Local Government Services, in consultation with the State Treasurer, shall determine the terms, conditions, and repayment schedule, if any, that shall be established and shall be memorialized in a memorandum of understanding to be entered into between the Department of Community Affairs and the municipality. 26 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 16 Detention and Rehabilitation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 07-7040  Institutional Control and Supervision................. $9,805,000 08-7040  Institutional Care and Treatment......................... $6,610,000 99-7040  Administration and Support Services.................. $2,345,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Detention and Rehabilitation.......................... $18,760,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages.................................... ($18,760,000) 34 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 31 Direct Educational Services and Assistance STATE AID 03-5120  Miscellaneous Grants-In-Aid............................... $9,150,000 (From General Fund:$5,650,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$3,500,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance... $9,150,000 (From General Fund:$5,650,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$3,500,000) State Aid: 03   Charter School Facility Improvements (PTRF)............................................................. ($3,500,000) 03   Bloomfield Public Schools - Operating Aid............ ................................................................... ($100,000) 03   East Orange School District - Operating Aid ($100,000) 03   Hammonton Public Schools - Capital Improvements................................................................ ($250,000) 03   Little Ferry Public Schools  Capital Construction............................................................. ($2,500,000) 03   Roselle Borough School District - Capital Improvements................................................................ ($500,000) 03   South Amboy School District - Capital Improvements................................................................ ($700,000) 03   Township of Union Public Schools  Operating Aid............................................................. ($1,500,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Charter School Facility Improvements, to protect the health and safety of students, [$8,000,000] $11,500,000 shall be provided to the Department of Education to administer grants to support emergent needs, capital maintenance, and facilities costs in charter schools and renaissance school projects upon the review of the Director of the New Jersey Department of Education Office of Charter and Renaissance Schools. 34 Educational Support Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 32-5061  Recruitment, Preparation, Certification and Educator Evaluation............................................................................... $500,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Educational Support Services.............................. $500,000 Direct State Services: 32   Educator Employment Web Portal (P.L.2025, c.208)................................................................ ($500,000) 42 ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 44 Site Remediation and Waste Management GRANTS-IN-AID 19-4815  Publicly-Funded Site Remediation and Response. $700,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Site Remediation and Waste Management......... $700,000 Grants-in-Aid: 19   Middlesex County Fire Marshal - Foam Replacement Initiative................................................. ($700,000) 46 Environmental Planning and Administration STATE AID 99-4800  Administration and Support Services.................. $2,000,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Site Remediation and Waste Management...... $2,000,000 State Aid: 99   Essex County - Mosquito Control, Research, Administration and Operations.............................. ................................................................ ($2,000,000) 46 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 20 Physical and Mental Health 21 Health Services GRANTS-IN-AID 03-4230  Epidemiology, Environmental and Occupational Health............................................................................ $5,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Health Services.................................................. $5,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 03   South Jersey Cancer Program - Cooper University Healthcare........................................... ($5,000,000) 22 Health Planning and Evaluation GRANTS-IN-AID 07-4270  Health Care Systems Analysis........................... $17,600,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Health Planning and Evaluation..................... $17,600,000 Grants-in-Aid: 07   Allaire Health Services - Capacity Expansion ($750,000) 07   Capital Health Regional Medical Center - Infrastructure Support................................................ ($4,000,000) 07   City of Newark Access to Health Care Partnership........................................................... ($10,000,000) 07   Inspira Health System - Expansion of Autism Diagnostic Center.................................................. ($1,250,000) 07   Saint Peter's University Hospital......... ($1,600,000) Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated to Saint Peter's University Hospital, amounts may be transferred to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, consistent with CMS guidelines, solely to maximize federal Medicaid payments to faculty physicians and non-physician professionals who are affiliated with the Saint Peter's Healthcare System, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 66 DEPARTMENT OF LAW AND PUBLIC SAFETY 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 13 Special Law Enforcement Activities DIRECT STATE SERVICES 22-1410  Regulation of Racing Activities........................ $15,000,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Special Law Enforcement Activities............. $15,000,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 22   Horse Racing Purse Subsidies............ ($15,000,000) 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Educational Services 2445 Rowan University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2445  Institutional Support........................................... $14,849,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Rowan University........................................... $14,849,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   Cooper Medical School of Rowan University ($6,550,000) 82   Cooper Medical School - Cooper University Hospital Support................................................ ($8,299,000) 2485 University Hospital GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2485  Institutional Support........................................... $50,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, University Hospital......................................... $50,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   University Hospital............................. ($50,000,000) 37 Cultural and Intellectual Development Services GRANTS-IN-AID 05-2530  Support of the Arts.................................................... $75,000 07-2540  Development of Historical Resources.................... $200,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Cultural and Intellectual Development Services .......................................................................... $275,000 Grants-in-Aid: 05   Axelrod Performing Arts Center............... ($75,000) 07   New Jersey Fire Museum and Fallen Firefighters Memorial (P.L.2021, c.463)................................... ................................................................... ($200,000) 78 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 60 Transportation Programs 62 Public Transportation STATE AID 04-6050  Railroad and Bus Operations.................................. $100,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Public Transportation........................................... $100,000 State Aid: 04   County of Essex - Transit Infrastructure Improvements................................................................ ($100,000) 82 DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Educational Services GRANTS-IN-AID 47-2155  Support to Independent Institutions....................... $200,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Higher Educational Services............................... $200,000 Grants-in-Aid: 47   Saint Elizabeth University - Facility Improvements................................................................ ($200,000) STATE AID 48-2155  Aid to County Colleges........................................... $700,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Higher Educational Services............................... $700,000 State Aid: 48   Mercer County Community College  Capital Improvements........................................ ($700,000) 94 INTERDEPARTMENTAL ACCOUNTS 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 74 General Government Services GRANTS-IN-AID 09-9460  Aid to Independent Authorities......................... $40,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, General Government Services........................ $40,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 09     New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority  International Events, Improvements and Attraction ($40,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority  International Events, Improvements and Attraction may be transferred to other State departments and State agencies to pay for necessary costs and expenses associated with performing host city responsibilities and other 2026 FIFA World Cup tournament-related responsibilities incurred by the State and units of local government, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 2.  The following language provision in section 1 of P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for State fiscal year 2026, is amended to read as follows: 42 ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 45 Environmental Regulation DIRECT STATE SERVICES Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, there is appropriated $15,000,000 from the Clean Energy Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection for the purposes of supporting the Electric School Bus Program, established pursuant to P.L.2022, c.86 (C.26:2C-8.58).  Further, there is appropriated an additional $4,000,000 from the Clean Energy Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection to support the Vehicle-to-Grid Pilot program, subject to the approval of the Director of Budget and Accounting. 3.  The following language provision enacted by section 1 of P.L.2025, c.404 is amended to read as follows: 82 DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 51 Economic Planning and Development GRANTS-IN-AID The amount hereinabove appropriated for New Jerseys AI Supercomputer Initiative  Support and Advancement shall be used by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority to provide a grant to [an institution of higher education] one or more nonprofit organizations to fund the [supplementary infrastructure] costs of the [institution of higher education of hosting] infrastructure, maintenance, and operation of a new state-of-the-art supercomputer, including system management, rental payments, energy costs, salary costs of engineers, researchers, and support staff, security, user access, and research support, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 4.  The following language provisions are added to the General Provisions of P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for fiscal year 2026, as follows: GENERAL PROVISIONS Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, provided that sufficient funds are available, revenues deposited into the Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund pursuant to section 41 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-50) may be reallocated as determined by the State Treasurer and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting to fund programs appropriated from revenues deposited into the Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund pursuant to section 41 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-50). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, if receipts, fees, and penalties to the Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund, established pursuant to section 41 of P.L.2021,c.16 (C.24:6I-50), are less than anticipated, there are appropriated from the General Fund to the Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund such amounts as are determined necessary by the State Treasurer; provided, however, such amounts do not exceed the difference between actual receipts, fees, and penalties and the amount anticipated to be deposited in the Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund, established pursuant to section 41 of P.L.2021,c.16 (C.24:6I-50), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.